dictsource/mnc_rules
// ***************************************************************************
// *   Copyright (C) 2005 to 2014 by Jonathan Duddington                     *
// *   email: jonsd@users.sourceforge.net                                    *
// *                                                                         *
// *   This program is free software; you can redistribute it and/or modify  *
// *   it under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by  *
// *   the Free Software Foundation; either version 3 of the License, or     *
// *   (at your option) any later version.                                   *
// *                                                                         *
// *   This program is distributed in the hope that it will be useful,       *
// *   but WITHOUT ANY WARRANTY; without even the implied warranty of        *
// *   MERCHANTABILITY or FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE.  See the         *
// *   GNU General Public License for more details.                          *
// *                                                                         *
// *   You should have received a copy of the GNU General Public License     *
// *   along with this program; if not, see:                                 *
// *               <http://www.gnu.org/licenses/>.                           *
// ***************************************************************************/

// This file is UTF-8 encoded

// Conditional rules
// ?2  Use voiceless [w#] for "wh"
// ?3  General American
// ?!3  Not General American
// ?5  split [3:] er [3:], ir [IR], ur [VR]
// ?6  'one' = [wVn], 'of' = [Vv] (now uses phoneme [02])
// ?7  Scottish
// ?8  Use full vowel, not schwa in some word endings


// Group Y, vowels + y
.L01  l r
.L02  i y
.L03  a i o u   // vowel, not 'e'
.L04  e i y
.L05  c g k
.L06  s z
.L07  b d g  m n r  bE dE lE nE   // before voiced s in -sman
.L08  t d s z n x    // dental, drop [j] before [u:]
.L10  graph log met scop  // scientific endings
.L11  ä ö ü ae ø


.replace
   ﬀ   ff     // ligature
   ﬁ   fi
   ﬂ   fl


.group a
        a          a
     _) a'         a#
     _) a's (_     eIz
     -) a (-       a#
     _) a (-       'eI
     _) a (-half   a#
     X) a ($w_alt3++++++ a#
     X) a ($w_alt6++++ eI
    sw) a (B       0
        a (Be#     eI
        a (Bei     a
     w) a (Be#     eI
        a (Beu     a
        a (Beup#   eI
        a (Cee+    a
        a (BeCo_   a
        a (BerA    a
        a (BeroA#  eI
        a (BerC    a
        a (Bet     a
     @) a (Bia     'eI
     @) a (Biu     'eI
        a (Bo_     'A:
        a (Bu_     'A:
    XC) a (By_     eI
        a (Ca_     'A:
        a (Cability eI
        a (Cable   'eI
        a (Cably   'eI
     n) a (Cal     eI
        a (Cie_    eI
        a (Cible   'eI
     &) a (X$w_alt2+++ @
     &) a (_       @
     _) a (_       a#
    &b) a (_       =@
    D_) a (_       eI
    XC) a (_       A:
    lt) a (_       =@
     _) a (_-      eI
     _) a (_D      ,eI
        aa         A:
    aa) aa         a:
        aa (a      a:
        aar        'A@
     w) a (b       0
    gl) a (ci      eI
     r) a (ciA     eI
     w) a (d       0
    ow) a (d       @
        ae         i:
     @) aea        'i@
     @) aed (_S2   d
        ae (l      eI
        aeg (er    eIg
     h) ae (m      i:
     h) aemorrh    Em3r
        aeon (_    i:0n
        aer        e@
     r) aer        'A@
    _c) aer        %e@
     _) aer (o     e@
     _) aero       e@roU
        aero (plan e@r@
        aero (sol  e@r@
   _an) ae (s      @
     m) ae (st     aI
        ae (val    'i:
    sw) a (g       a
        a (hA_     'A:
        ah (K      A:
        ah (y      ah
        ahr (_N    A@
     &) ah (_      @
     m) a (hog     @
    _r) aj         A:dZ
    _m) a (je      a#
     m) a (jor_    eI
    _m) a (jor@    a#
     _) a (ki      a#
     @) a (ki_     'a
     @) ak (ia     ak
        aku (_     'A:ku:
    sw) a (m_      a
    sw) a (nk      a
        ao         eI0
     m) ao         aU
     p) ao         aU
     t) ao         aU
        ao (_      =aU
        aois (_    i:S
        aoise (_   i:S@
     g) ao (l      eI@
        aor        eI'o@
     m) ao (ri     aU
     _) a (qu      a#
        aqu (aK    akw
        aqu (ariA  a#kw
        aqua (t    @kwa
        aque (o    eIkwI
     _) aqui       akwI
     w) a (s       0
   squ) a (sh      0
        a (sion    eI
    er) a (sur     eI
     l) a (th      aa
    sw) a (th      eI
        a (the_+   eI
     p) a (tien    eI
   irr) a (tio     a
        a (tion    'eI
    _r) a (tion    a
    _n) a (tional  a
     @) a (tious   'eI
     n) a (tur     eI
     n) a (tura    a
     &) a (ture_   @
  sign) a (ture    I
     _) a (ve      a
     _) a (viat    eI
     _) a (von     eI
        aw         O:
        a (wA      a
     _) aw (a+     a#w
     r) awal       O:l
        a (way_    @
     _) awe        O:
        awe (B     O:
        awe (_     O:
     _) aw (f      O:
     _) a (wh@     a#
     @) awi (_     'A:wI
     _) aw (k      O:
     _) aw (ok     a#w
        awr (_     aU@
        awy (er_   OI
     C) a (x+      a
     _) a (x+      a
        ay         eI
     _) ay         aI
     w) ay         eI
     k) ay (a_     'A:j     
     k) ayak       aIak
     _) ayle       eI@L
     _) ayr        e@
     h) a (zA      eI
    sw) a (z       A:
     r) a (zi      eI
     h) a (zar     'a
     g) a (zeC%    @
   _gh) a (z       A:
    @k) aze (_     'A:zI
     @) a (zi_     'A:
        a (zide    'eI
    br) a (zil     a
    bl) a (zon     eI
     r) azor       eIz3
        a (zy      eI
        a (zz_     'a
     k) a (zoo     a#

.group ab
     _) ab (@      a#b
        ab (acA    ab
     @) abi (_     'A:bi
     @) abad (_    =a#bA#d
        ab (att    ab
     _) abb        ab
     _) abbo       ab@
     _) abb (rev   a#b
     _) ab (d      ab
     _) ab (duc    a#b

     _) abel       eIb@L
     _) aber (@    ,ab3
     C) aber (@    ab3
    _s) aber (@    eIb3
     _) aber (ran  a#bE
     _) ab (i      ab
     _) ab (ide    a#b
    _l) ab (i      eIb
    st) ab (il     eIb
     C) ab (ilit+  @b
        ab (ject   ab
        ab (lativ  ab
        able       eIb@L
        abling     'eIblIN
        ably       eIblI
   _en) ab (l      'eIb
//    XC) ab (le     eIb
   _un) ab (le     'eIb
  _dis) ab (le     'eIb
     t) ab (leau   ab
        ab (neg    ab
        ab (olit   ,ab
     _) ab (ori    ,ab
    _l) abor       eIb3
     l) ab (our    eIb
     _) above (@P5 a#b,Vv
     _) ab (ram    eIb
     _) ab (ra     a#b
     _) ab (rac    ab
        ab (rog    ab
        ab (ruc    ab
        ab (sce    ab
        ab (sei    ab
     _) ab (sen    ab
     _) abse (ntC  abs@
        ab (solu   ab
        ab (sti    ab
        ab (ular   'ab
     b) ab (y      eIb
     b) ab (yl     ab
     &) able (_S4iev @b@L    // suffix
   Aur) able (_S4v  @b@L    // suffix
    et) able (_S4  @b@L
     &) able (_$w_alt1 eIb@L
   min) able (_    @b@L
    &c) able (_    @b@L
   @ct) able (_    =@b@L
     &) ability (S7iev @b'IlI2t%i // suffix
     &) abilities (S9iev @b'IlI2t%iz // suffix
     &) ably (_S4iefv @bl%i
   Aur) ably (_S4fv @bl%i
    &c) ably (_S4fv @bl%i
   min) ably (_    @bl%i
     &) ab (y      @b

.group ac
     _) ac (@      a#k
     _) acc (@     a#k
     _) acc (e     a#ks
     _) acqu       a#kw
        aca (dem   ak@
        aca (demy  a#ka
     v) ac (a      eIk
  _dur) acell      @sEl
        ac (cent   ak
        ac (centu  %ak
        accessib   aks'Es@b
        acci (_    'A:tSi
        ac (cid    ak
        acc (ol    ak
        accou (t   a#ku:
        accu (ra   akjU
        accus (A   a#kju:z
        ace (_     eIs
        ace (_$w_alt2 @s
    sp) ac (e#     eIs
    _r) ace        eIs
    _r) ace (m     a#si:
     _) ac (e      a#s
    _r) ac (is     eIs
        acean (_   'eIS@n
    pl) ac (at     a#k
?3 _pl) ac (at     eIk
    pl) ac (eb     @s
   _pl) ac (ent    @s
    _b) ach        A:k
     b) acher (_   A:k3
     m) acher (_   A:k3
        ac (erb    as
     _) ac (erbi   a#s
     _) ace (t     asI
     _) ace (ti    a#si:
 pharm) aceu       a#su:
     @) ach (a_    'A:tS
     _) ache (+    eIk
     d) ache (_    eIk
     h) ache (_    eIk
     k) ache (_    eIk
     r) ache (_    eIk
    rt) ache (_    eIk
     y) ache (_    eIk
     d) aches (_   eIks
     h) aches (_   eIks
     k) aches (_   eIks
     r) aches (_   eIks
    rt) aches (_   eIks
        achey (_S1 i
    tr) ach (e     a#k
    tr) ach (eo    eIk
    _b) achelor    atS@l3
     _) ach        a#tS
        achia      'eIS@
     f) ac (ilit   @s
    _m) ace (d     asI
     b) ach (_     A:x
     m) achi (nA#  @Si:
     m) achina (t  akI2neI
        ach (rom   ak
        ac (id_    as
     _) ac (i      a#s
        acial      eIS@L
        acious     'eIS@s
     _) ack        ak
     _) ack (n     a#k
     &) ac (le_    @k
     _) ac (o      ak
        ac (on     ak
        ac (orn    eIk
        acme       akmI
        acne       aknI
        acou (st   a#ku:
        ac (quie   ,a
     _) acre       eIk3
  mass) acre       @k3
     _) ac (ri     ak
        ac (ro     ak
     m) acro (@    akr@
        ac (rum_   'eIk
     _) ac (t      ak
        actu (A    aktSu:
        ac (ture   'ak
        ac (um     ak
        ac (up     ak
        ac (ular   'ak
   urf) ac (e_     Is
    @n) ac (e_     Is
   sol) ac (e_     Is
    al) ac (e_     Is
    im) ac (e_     Is
    rr) ac (e_     Is
    _b) ac (o      eIk
     y) ach (t     0
     &) ac (y_     @s
    cr) ac (y_     =@s

.group ad
     _) ad (@      a#d
     _) add        ad
     _) add (end   a#d
     _) add (ict   a#d
     _) add (itio  a#d
     _) add (r     a#d
     _) add (u     a#d
     _) ad (L05    ad
     _) adj        a#dZ
    cr) ad (l      eId
  crus) ad         'eId
        ad (ag     ad
        ad (am     ad
     c) ada (ver   a#da
     _) ad (aw     ad
        add (er    ad
        adequa     adIkw@
        add (itiv  ad
     _) add (l     ad
   _bl) ad (e#     eId
        ad (en     ad
     l) ad (en     eId
     c) ad (enc    eId
        ad (eq     ad
     l) ade (sh    ad'E
     _) ad (i      ad
    gl) ad (i      ad
        adjec      adZEk
     _) ad (l      ad
        ad (le_    eId
        ad (junct_ ad
        ad (jutan  a
        ad (man_   ad
        ad (min_   ad
        ad (mira   ad
        ado (les   ad@
        ad (ol     ad
        ad (on     ad
     _) ad (orat   ad
     _) ad (ri@    ad
        ad (ula    ad
?3      adu (la    adZ@
     _) ad (um     ad
        ad (vent   ad
        ad (ventu  a#d
        ad (ver    ad
        ad (vert_  ad
        ad (vert   a#d
     _) advo       adv@
   _gr) ad (a      eId
   hex) ad (e      ad
  torn) ad         eId
    _r) ad (L03    eId
    _r) adio (@P5  r,eIdI%oU
     r) adi (oL10+ eIdI
     b) ad (os_    eId
    _s) ado (ma    ,eIdoU
        ad (iA     eId
     s) ad (is     eId
   _tr) ad (it     a#d
    qu) ad         0d
     l) ad (y      eId
   mal) ad (y      @d
     r) ad (ic     ad

.group af
     _) af (@      a#f
     _) aff (@     a#f
        af (ea     a#f
    st) aff        aaf
        aff (ab    af
        aff (er    af
     _) affia      a#faI@
        aff (lu    af
     w) aff        0f
     _) af (g      af
        afore      a#fo@
        af (ri     af
     _) afro       afroU
        af (t+     aaf
     @) af (ter    'aaf
